test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-aeqbtwks_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - äbțõks: # Noun 208 'eng /est vahend/fin' - full paradigm
     äbțõks+N+Sg+Nom: äʼbțõks
     äbțõks+N+Sg+Gen: äʼbțõks
     äbțõks+N+Sg+Par: äʼbțõkst
     äbțõks+N+Sg+Dat: äʼbțõksõn
     äbțõks+N+Sg+Ins: äʼbțõksõks
     äbțõks+N+Sg+Ill: äʼbțõksõ
     äbțõks+N+Sg+Ela: äʼbțõksõst
     äbțõks+N+Pl+Nom: äʼbțõkst
     äbțõks+N+Pl+Gen: äʼbțõkst
     äbțõks+N+Pl+Par: äʼbțõkši
     äbțõks+N+Pl+Dat: äʼbțõkstõn
     äbțõks+N+Pl+Ins: äʼbțõkstõks
     äbțõks+N+Pl+Ill: äʼbțõkšiz
     äbțõks+N+Pl+Ela: äʼbțõkšist
